Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Chapter 8. Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts.

§§ 16.1-139 through 16.1-217.

Repealed by Acts 1977, c. 559.

Cross references.

For new sections covering the same subject matter as the repealed sections, see §§

16.1-226

through

16.1-334

.

§§ 16.1-217.1 through 16.1-217.4.

Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 341.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to child abuse and neglect, see §

63.2-1500

et seq.